Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1758.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Subchapter C of Chapter 74 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[SUBCHAPTER CEMPLOYMENT SANCTIONSSec.7421. Scope of subchapter.7422. Definitions.7423. Prohibition on termination and discipline.7424. Prohibition on discrimination.7425. Lost time.7426. Statements.7427. Violations.123456789101112131415161718 § 7421. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to employment sanctions.§ 7422. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Discipline." The taking of an action against an employee which adversely affects his regular pay to an extent greater than permitted by section 7425 (relating to lost time), his job status, his opportunity for promotion or his right to any benefit granted by the employer to other similarly situated employees."Discriminate." To discharge or to discipline in a manner inconsistent with the employer's treatment of other similarly situated employees who are injured in the course of their employment or related activities."Employer." An individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust or a person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to any employee."Line of duty." Going to, coming from or during fire prevention and safety activities which includes fire prevention, first aid, rescue and salvage, ambulance service, fire police work, assistance at accidents, control of crowds both on the fire grounds and at occasions of public or general assembly, animal rescue, abatement of conditions due to storm, flood or general peril, abatement or removal of hazards to safety and other activities as are commonly undertaken by fire companies, ambulance services or rescue squads or their affiliated organizations.20250HB1758PN2166 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7423. Prohibition on termination and discipline.No employer shall terminate or discipline an employee who is a volunteer fireman, a volunteer member of the fire police or a volunteer member of an ambulance service or rescue squad and, in the line of duty, has responded to a call prior to the time he was due to report for work resulting in a loss of time from his employment.§ 7424. Prohibition on discrimination.No employer shall discriminate against an employee because the employee has been injured in the line of duty as a volunteer fireman, a volunteer member of the fire police or a volunteer member of an ambulance service or rescue squad, nor shall an employer discriminate against an employee injured in the line of duty as a volunteer fireman, a volunteer member of the fire police or a volunteer member of an ambulance service or rescue squad who subsequently returns to work after receiving workers' compensation benefits under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.§ 7425. Lost time.Time lost from employment as provided in section 7423 (relating to prohibition on termination and discipline) may be charged to the regular pay of the employee.§ 7426. Statements.An employee losing time as provided in section 7423 (relating to prohibition on termination and discipline) shall supply his employer with a statement from the chief executive officer of his volunteer fire company, ambulance service or rescue squad or its affiliated organization stating that he responded to a call and the time of the call.§ 7427. Violations.20250HB1758PN2166 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Employers.--An employer who willfully and knowingly violates this subchapter shall be required to revoke a disciplinary action and any penalty attached thereto or to reinstate such employee to his former position and shall be required to pay the employee all lost wages and benefits for the period between termination and reinstatement and reasonable attorney fees incurred in an action to recover lost wages and benefits.(b) Statute of limitations.--An action to enforce this subchapter shall be commenced within two years of the date of violation, and the action shall be commenced in the court of common pleas of the county in which the employer is located.]Section 2. Title 35 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 74AVOLUNTEER EMERGENCY RESPONDERS EMPLOYER TAX CREDITSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Private Sector IncentivesC. Public Sector IncentivesSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.74A01. Scope of chapter.74A02. Definitions.74A03. Employment discrimination prohibited.§ 74A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit.§ 74A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 20250HB1758PN2166 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth." A department, agency, board, commission or instrumentality of State government."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Discipline." To take action against an employee which adversely affects the employee's regular pay to an extent not provided for in this chapter, the employee's job status or opportunity for promotion or the employee's right to any benefit granted by the employer to other similarly situated employees."Discriminate." To discharge or to discipline in a manner inconsistent with the employer's treatment of other similarly situated employees who are injured in the course of employment or related activities."Employee-volunteer." A member of a volunteer emergency service organization who is in the employ of the Commonwealth, a political subdivision or a private employer."Employer." An individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust or a person or group of persons who controls and directs a worker under an express or implied contract of hire and who pays the worker's salary or wages. The term includes the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions."Line of duty." Going to, coming from or during fire prevention and safety activities, which include fire prevention, first aid, rescue and salvage, ambulance service, fire police work, assistance at accidents, control of crowds both on the fire grounds and at occasions of public or general assembly, animal rescue, abatement of conditions due to storm, flood or general peril, abatement or removal of hazards to safety and other activities as are commonly undertaken by fire companies, 20250HB1758PN2166 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ambulance services or rescue squads or affiliated organizations."Pass-through entity." A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, or a Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Political subdivision." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, school district or municipal authority."Qualified tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. The term does not include a tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Tax credit." The volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit established under section 74A11 (relating to volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit)."Taxpayer." An entity that is subject to a tax imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. The term does not include a tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Volunteer emergency service organization." An organization which is a volunteer fire company, volunteer EMS company, volunteer rescue company or volunteer hazardous material response team."Volunteer EMS company." As defined in section 7802 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer fire company." As defined in section 7802."Volunteer hazardous material response team." A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in 20250HB1758PN2166 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this Commonwealth whose members are certified and organized to provide emergency response services to mitigate actual or potential immediate threats to public health and the environment in response to the release or threat of a release of a hazardous material. The term includes teams certified to perform stabilization actions needed to remove threats to public health and the environment from hazardous material releases."Volunteer rescue company." As defined in section 7802.§ 74A03. Employment discrimination prohibited.(a) General prohibition.--It is unlawful for an employer to refuse to hire or employ an individual because the individual is a member of a volunteer emergency service organization.(b) Prohibition on discipline and discrimination for time lost.--(1) It is unlawful for an employer to discipline or discriminate or to discharge from employment an employee-volunteer with respect to base salary, hire, tenure, terms, conditions or privileges of employment for the reason that the employee-volunteer responded to an emergency call prior to the time the employee-volunteer was due to report to work, resulting in loss of time from employment, if the employee-volunteer satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2).(2) An employee-volunteer who loses time for reasons specified in this section shall immediately upon arriving at work inform the employee-volunteer's employer or immediate supervisor that the employee-volunteer has been called to respond to an emergency. The employee-volunteer losing time as provided for under this chapter shall supply the employee-volunteer's employer with a statement from the chief executive officer of the volunteer emergency service 20250HB1758PN2166 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization for which the employee-volunteer volunteers stating that employee-volunteer responded to a call and the time of the call.(3) If an employee-volunteer is employed by a private employer, any time lost from employment may be charged against the employee-volunteer's regular salary or wages or the private employer may apply for the tax credits provided under section 74A11(a) (relating to volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit).(4) If an employee-volunteer is employed by the Commonwealth or a political subdivision, payment of salary or wages for time lost from employment shall be based on a policy adopted by the Commonwealth or the political subdivision.(c) Discrimination because of injury.--It is unlawful for an employer to discipline or to discharge from employment or to otherwise discriminate against an employee-volunteer with respect to hiring, compensation, tenure, terms, conditions or privileges of employment because the employee-volunteer has been injured in the line of duty and has subsequently returned to work, regardless of whether the employee-volunteer received any workers' compensation benefits under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.(d) Legal action.--An employer who willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of this chapter shall:(1) Revoke disciplinary action or penalty imposed against an employee-volunteer or reinstate the employee-volunteer to his or her former position.(2) Pay the employee-volunteer all lost wages and benefits for the period between termination and reinstatement 20250HB1758PN2166 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and reasonable attorney fees which are incurred in an action to recover lost wages and benefits.(e) Period of limitations.--An action to enforce the provisions of this chapter shall be commenced within a period of two years from the date of violation, and the action shall be commenced in the court of common pleas of the county in which the employer is located.SUBCHAPTER BPRIVATE SECTOR INCENTIVESSec.74A11. Volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit.74A12. Application for tax credit.74A13. Review and approval.74A14. Limitations.74A15. Shareholder, owner or member pass-through.74A16. Guidelines.74A17. Applicability.74A18. Reports.§ 74A11. Volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit.(a) Eligibility.--A taxpayer that is an employer shall be eligible to receive a tax credit against qualified tax liability if the taxpayer permits an employee-volunteer to take a paid leave of absence for any of the following:(1) In response to an emergency call or to respond to an emergency call prior to the start of work.(2) At the written request of the chief executive officer of the volunteer emergency service organization in order to participate as a student or instructor in training appropriate to the volunteer emergency services organization.(b) Official notice required.--20250HB1758PN2166 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) In order to qualify for the paid leave of absence as provided for in subsection (a)(1), the employee-volunteer shall provide notice that the employee-volunteer has been called to respond to an emergency or provide notice that employee-volunteer responded to a call and the time of the call and request that a leave of absence be granted.(2) In order to qualify for the paid leave of absence as provided for in subsection (a)(2), the employee-volunteer shall provide the employer, within 14 days of the scheduled training, a signed statement from the chief executive officer of the volunteer emergency service organization that includes the reason and amount of time needed for the employee-volunteer to complete the training along with a request that a leave of absence be granted.§ 74A12. Application for tax credit.A taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit certificate under this section. The application must be on a form required by the department and shall include all of the following information:(1) The name and address of the taxpayer.(2) Documentation of the following for each eligible employee-volunteer in which a tax credit is being claimed:(i) Name and address of the employee-volunteer.(ii) Total wages paid by the taxpayer to the employee-volunteer.(iii) Wages paid by the taxpayer to the employee-volunteer paid under section 74A11(a) (relating to volunteer emergency responders employer tax credit).(iv) Documentation as required by section 74A11(a)(2) or (b).20250HB1758PN2166 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Any other information required by the department.§ 74A13. Review and approval.(a) Duties.--The department shall do all of the following:(1) Review and approve applications according to the order applications are received and the availability of tax credits.(2) Notify the applicant within 30 days of receipt of the application of its determination.(b) Issuance.--If an application is approved, the department shall issue the taxpayer a tax credit certificate within 15 days of the approval.§ 74A14. Limitations.(a) Amount.--A tax credit certificate issued under this section may not exceed 50% of a taxpayer's qualified tax liability.(b) Prohibition.--In granting tax credits under this chapter, the department may not do any of the following:(1) Grant more than $5,000,000 in tax credit certificates in any fiscal year.(2) Grant more than $10,000 in tax credit certificates to a single taxpayer in any fiscal year.(c) Unused credits.--A taxpayer may not be entitled to carry forward, carry back or obtain a refund of the unused tax credit.(d) Sale or reassignment.--A tax credit may not be sold or reassigned.§ 74A15. Shareholder, owner or member pass-through.(a) Shareholder entitlement.--If a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have an eligible tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder of the Pennsylvania S corporation shall be entitled to a tax credit 20250HB1758PN2166 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equal to the tax credit determined for the Pennsylvania S corporation for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the Pennsylvania S corporation's distributive income to which the shareholder is entitled.(b) Pass-through entity entitlement.--If a pass-through entity other than a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, an owner or member of the pass-through entity shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the pass-through entity for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the pass-through entity's distributive income to which the owner or member is entitled.(c) Additional credit.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the tax credit provided under subsection (a) or (b) shall be in addition to any other tax credit to which a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity is otherwise entitled under this chapter.(2) A pass-through entity and a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity may not claim a tax credit under this chapter for the same employee-volunteer.§ 74A16. Guidelines.The department, in conjunction with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall develop written guidelines necessary for the implementation and administration of this chapter. The guidelines shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 74A17. Applicability.This chapter shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.20250HB1758PN2166 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 74A18. Reports.No later than June 1, 2027, and each June 1 thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall submit a report on the effectiveness of the tax credits granted under this chapter. The report shall include the names of taxpayers who were issued tax credits as of the date of the report. The report may include recommendations for changes in the calculation or administration of the tax credits and other information as the department deems appropriate. The report shall be submitted to all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and the minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.SUBCHAPTER CPUBLIC SECTOR INCENTIVESSec.74A21. Emergency response leave of absence.§ 74A21. Emergency response leave of absence.(a) Optional paid leave.--An officer or employee of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision who is an employee-volunteer may be entitled to leave work in response to an emergency call without loss of pay, time or efficiency, subject to the terms and conditions of a policy adopted by the Commonwealth or political subdivision.20250HB1758PN2166 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Official notice required.--In order to qualify for the paid leave as provided for in subsection (a), the employee-volunteer shall:(1) Inform his or her employer or immediate supervisor that the employee-volunteer has been called to respond to an emergency and request that a leave of absence be granted.(2) Supply his or her employer with a statement from the chief executive officer of the emergency service organization stating that he or she responded to a call and the time of the call.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1758PN2166 - 14 - 1234567891011